Maine, session 132, LD1234.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§23 is enacted to read:
23. Cellular telephone policy. By August 1, 2026, a school board shall adopt and
implement a policy related to use of personal electronic devices during the school day. The
policy must include, but is not limited to, provisions related to student use of cellular
telephones and wearable electronic devices with Internet or cellular network connectivity
capabilities.
Page 1 - 132LR0023(03)